Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0165

Commission—Qualifications of members.

Members must be residents of this state. Members must be licensed chiropractors for a period of five years before appointment. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

[ 2022 c 240 s 31; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 106.]